Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-2393
Withdrawal of securities; when; effect.

A bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution which has furnished securities pursuant to the Public Funds Deposit Security Act may withdraw all or any part of such securities upon repayment to the custodial official, director, or administrator, as applicable, of the amount of the securities thus withdrawn, and thereupon the custodial official, director, or administrator, as applicable, shall be empowered to assign such securities to the owner thereof. All interest coupons attached to securities furnished under the act shall be detached by the holder or qualified trustee thirty days before maturity and returned to such bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution.

Laws 1996, LB 1274, § 8;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 88;

Laws 2021, LB66, § 2.